Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-27,132.01
Tax Refund Fund balance; transfer; allocation.

The balance of the Tax Refund Fund shall, on June 30, 1989, be transferred by the State Treasurer to the Revenue Distribution Fund and shall be allocated as required by the sections crediting amounts to the Tax Refund Fund prior to such date.

Laws 1989, LB 258, § 13.